Vermont, session 2025-2026, H793.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS AND PURPOSE
(a) The General Assembly finds that artificial legal persons, including
corporations, limited liability companies, partnerships, cooperative
associations, and mutual benefit enterprises are created under the laws of this
State and possess only those powers that the State expressly grants.
(b) Under Chapter II, § 69 of the Vermont Constitution, the General
Assembly provides by general law for the organization of corporations and
retains the authority to alter or repeal such general laws from time to time.
Accordingly, the General Assembly retains full authority to revise, limit, or
withdraw the statutory powers conferred upon artificial legal persons as a
matter of general law, as the General Assembly determines.
(c) Broad statutory clauses in Vermont’s entity laws, including
authorizations to do all things necessary or convenient to carry out an entity’s
purposes, have at times been construed to include powers to engage in election
activity and ballot-issue activity. The General Assembly finds that such
political spending authority was never intended to be among the powers
granted to artificial legal persons under Vermont law.
VT LEG #385330 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.793
2026 Page 3 of 25
(d) The purposes of this act are to:
(1) revoke any prior broad grants of powers to artificial legal persons
that may be construed to authorize election activity or ballot-issue activity;
(2) regrant only those powers necessary or convenient for lawful
business, charitable, cooperative, or organizational purposes, which powers do
not include, and shall not be construed to include, any authority to engage in
election activity or ballot-issue activity;
(3) establish uniform limitations across all entity forms while preserving
distinctions among them; and
(4) preserve and protect the constitutional rights of natural persons and
the lawful activities of political committees and political parties.
Sec. 2. 11 V.S.A. § 42 is amended to read:
§ 42. SPECIFIC PURPOSES
Subject to the provisions of this title, one or more persons may form a
private corporation for the specific purposes and in the manner following:
(1) To operate a regional clearinghouse and a cooperative loan plan,
commonly called a central fund, or either, for those banks in the State which
that become stockholders or members of the corporation. Such corporations
may be organized only with the consent of the Commissioner of Financial
Regulation, with or without capital stock.
VT LEG #385330 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.793
2026 Page 4 of 25
(A) In addition to the powers conferred by this chapter, they as
limited by this section, private corporations shall have the following powers:
(i) all the powers necessary or convenient for carrying out the
purposes herein set forth, including the power to receive deposits of funds from
a member bank and to administer the same, and to require such deposits from
all member banks in uniform percentages, but not in excess of three percent, of
the total deposits of any one bank;
(ii) to assist member banks when they are temporarily in need of
cash or hold investments which that cannot readily be liquidated;
(iii) to borrow money and to pledge its assets as security therefor;
(iv) to issue scrip to the extent and with such security and under
such regulations as the Commissioner of Financial Regulation, with the
consent of the Governor, may approve;
(v) to make loans to member banks and to guarantee the
performance of any obligation of a member bank; and
(vi) to establish reserves, and to take over from member banks
property, securities, or investments for the purpose of managing, liquidating,
exchanging, or adjusting the same.
* * *
(2) To operate a corporation for the rehabilitation of individuals and
families by enabling them to secure subsistence and gainful employment from
VT LEG #385330 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.793
2026 Page 5 of 25
the soil, from coordinate and affiliated industries and enterprises and
otherwise, and to receive and administer money for that purpose which may
become available from any source. Such corporations shall have all the
powers of corporations organized under this chapter and in addition thereto
may loan money and secure the payment thereof by mortgage, pledge, or lien,
insure or guarantee any indebtedness incurred by others, and become secured
for so doing by mortgage, pledge, or lien. Such corporations shall not be
organized for profit, and shall not be subject to taxation, nor shall any stock or
indebtedness of such corporations or any evidence thereof be taxable to any
holder thereof under any provision of law. The capital stock of such
corporations may be with or without par value and the amount thereof,
notwithstanding the provisions of this title, may be less than $500.00 and in
case the stock has no par value then the number of shares of such stock may be
less than ten 10, representing less than $500.00. The Governor may designate
any such corporation as his or her the Governor’s agent or an agency of the
State to carry on rehabilitation activities within the State. Such corporations
shall not be subject to the provisions of 8 V.S.A. chapters 1, 3, 21, and 29 and
8 V.S.A. part 3 and 9 V.S.A. chapter 131, or to the provisions of section 131 of
this title.
VT LEG #385330 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.793
2026 Page 6 of 25
(3) A corporation organized pursuant to this chapter possesses no power
to engage in election activity or ballot-issue activity, and any such activity is
ultra vires and void.
(4) As used in this section:
(A) “Ballot-issue activity” means paying, contributing, or expending
money or anything of value to support or oppose any initiative, referendum,
recall, constitutional amendment, charter amendment, or any other question
formally certified or submitted to the electors of the State or any of its political
subdivisions. “Ballot-issue activity” does not include any bona fide news
story, commentary, or editorial distributed through an independent news
organization not owned or controlled by a political party, political committee,
or candidate.
(B) “Election activity” means paying, contributing, or expending
money or anything of value to support or oppose a candidate, political party, or
political committee. “Election activity” does not include any bona fide news
story, commentary, or editorial distributed through an independent news
organization not owned or controlled by a political party, political committee,
or candidate.
VT LEG #385330 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.793
2026 Page 7 of 25
Sec. 3. 11 V.S.A. § 108 is amended to read:
§ 108. BANKS, TRUST AND MUTUAL INSURANCE COMPANIES
(a) A corporation organized under the provisions of 8 V.S.A. chapter 202
or 203, to conduct the business of a financial institution, and a mutual
insurance company organized under the provisions of 8 V.S.A. chapter 101,
may make such contributions for religious, charitable, scientific, literary, or
educational purposes as are authorized by its directors or trustees to an amount
not to exceed five percent of its net income for the previous calendar year
computed in the manner specified by the Internal Revenue Code in effect
during the year applicable for corporations. Contributions in excess of the five
percent of the net income may be made by a vote of its stockholders,
depositors, or members.
(b) A corporation organized under the provisions of 8 V.S.A. chapter 202
or 203, to conduct the business of a financial institution, and a mutual
insurance company organized under the provisions of 8 V.S.A. chapter 101,
possesses no power to engage in election activity or ballot-issue activity, and
any such activity is ultra vires and void.
(c) As used in this section:
(1) “Ballot-issue activity” means paying, contributing, or expending
money or anything of value to support or oppose any initiative, referendum,
recall, constitutional amendment, charter amendment, or any other question
VT LEG #385330 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.793
2026 Page 8 of 25
formally certified or submitted to the electors of the State or any of its political
subdivisions. “Ballot-issue activity” does not include any bona fide news
story, commentary, or editorial distributed through an independent news
organization not owned or controlled by a political party, political committee,
or candidate.
(2) “Election activity” means paying, contributing, or expending money
or anything of value to support or oppose a candidate, political party, or
political committee. “Election activity” does not include any bona fide news
story, commentary, or editorial distributed through an independent news
organization not owned or controlled by a political party, political committee,
or candidate.
Sec. 4. 11 V.S.A. § 994 is amended to read:
§ 994. POWERS
(a) Each association incorporated under this subchapter shall have the
following powers:
* * *
(10) To do everything necessary, suitable, or proper for the
accomplishment of any of the purposes or the attainment of any of the objects
herein enumerated, or conducive to or expedient for the interest or benefit of
the association, and to contract accordingly; to exercise and possess all powers,
rights, and privileges necessary or incidental to the purposes for which the
VT LEG #385330 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.793
2026 Page 9 of 25
association is organized or to the activities in which it is engaged, and, in
addition, any other rights, powers, and privileges granted by the laws of this
State to corporations organized under the general laws of this State, except
such as are inconsistent with the express provisions of this subchapter and to
the extent consistent with the artificial-person powers defined in subsection (e)
of this section; and to do any such thing anywhere.
(b) A cooperative association organized pursuant to this chapter has
artificial-person powers and only the powers expressly granted elsewhere in
this chapter.
(c) The creation and continued existence of a cooperative association
organized pursuant to this chapter is a conditional grant of legal status by the
State and remains subject to revocation or alteration at any time.
(d) Any action of a cooperative association constituting election activity or
ballot-issue activity is void and ultra vires.
(e) As used in this section:
(1) “Artificial-person powers” means the powers necessary or
convenient to lawful cooperative association purposes, excluding any authority
to engage in election activity or ballot-issue activity.
(2) “Ballot-issue activity” means paying, contributing, or expending
money or anything of value to support or oppose any initiative, referendum,
recall, constitutional amendment, charter amendment, or any other question
VT LEG #385330 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.793
2026 Page 10 of 25
formally certified or submitted to the electors of the State or any of its political
subdivisions. “Ballot-issue activity” does not include any bona fide news
story, commentary, or editorial distributed through an independent news
organization not owned or controlled by a political party, political committee,
or candidate.
(3) “Election activity” means paying, contributing, or expending money
or anything of value to support or oppose a candidate, political party, or
political committee. “Election activity” does not include any bona fide news
story, commentary, or editorial distributed through an independent news
organization not owned or controlled by a political party, political committee,
or candidate.
Sec. 5. 11 V.S.A. chapter 8 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 8. WORKER COOPERATIVE CORPORATIONS
* * *
§ 1093. POWERS
(a) The creation and continued existence of a worker cooperative
corporation governed by this chapter is a conditional grant of legal status by
the State and remains subject to revocation or alteration at any time.
(b) A worker cooperative corporation governed by this chapter has only
artificial-person powers and the powers otherwise applicable pursuant to Title
11A and expressly modified or supplemented by this chapter.
VT LEG #385330 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.793
2026 Page 11 of 25
(c) A worker cooperative corporation governed by this chapter possesses
no power to engage in election activity or ballot-issue activity, and any such
activity is ultra vires and void.
(d) As used in this section:
(1) “Artificial-person powers” means the powers necessary or
convenient to lawful worker cooperative corporation purposes, excluding any
authority to engage in election activity or ballot-issue activity.
(2) “Ballot-issue activity” means paying, contributing, or expending
money or anything of value to support or oppose any initiative, referendum,
recall, constitutional amendment, charter amendment, or any other question
formally certified or submitted to the electors of the State or any of its political
subdivisions. “Ballot-issue activity” does not include any bona fide news
story, commentary, or editorial distributed through an independent news
organization not owned or controlled by a political party, political committee,
or candidate.
(3) “Election activity” means paying, contributing, or expending money
or anything of value to support or oppose a candidate, political party, or
political committee. “Election activity” does not include any bona fide news
story, commentary, or editorial distributed through an independent news
organization not owned or controlled by a political party, political committee,
or candidate.
VT LEG #385330 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.793
2026 Page 12 of 25
Sec. 6. 11 V.S.A. § 4011 is amended to read:
§ 4011. NATURE OF BUSINESS AND POWERS; GOVERNING LAW
* * *
(e)(1) A limited liability company shall possess and may exercise all the
powers and privileges granted by this chapter, any other law, its articles of
organization, or its operating agreement, together with any powers incidental
thereto, so far as the powers and privileges are necessary or convenient to the
conduct, promotion, or attainment of the business purposes or activities of the
limited liability company, including power to sue and to be sued, complain and
defend in its company name, and the power to do all things necessary or
convenient to carry on its activities The creation and continued existence of a
limited liability company governed by this chapter is a conditional grant of
legal status by the State and remains subject to revocation or alteration at any
time.
(2) A limited liability company has only artificial-person powers and the
powers expressly granted elsewhere in this chapter.
(3) A limited liability company governed by this chapter possesses no
power to engage in election activity or ballot-issue activity, and any such
activity is ultra vires and void.
(4) A limited liability company that undertakes, finances, or directs
election activity or ballot-issue activity without authority pursuant to this
VT LEG #385330 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.793
2026 Page 13 of 25
chapter shall be required to remit payment to the Office of the State Treasurer
of an amount equal to the value expended in the activity.
(5) A foreign limited liability company that directly or indirectly
undertakes, finances, or directs election activity or ballot-issue activity in this
State, or with respect to any election or ballot measure submitted to the
electors of this State, is conclusively deemed to be transacting business in this
State for jurisdiction and enforcement purposes.
(6) Nothing in this section shall be construed to invalidate, impair, or
modify any contract, debt instrument, security, or other legal obligation
lawfully entered into by a limited liability company on or before December 31,
2026.
* * *
(h) As used in this section:
(1) “Artificial-person powers” means the powers necessary or
convenient to lawful limited liability company purposes, excluding any
authority to engage in election activity or ballot-issue activity.
(2) “Ballot-issue activity” means paying, contributing, or expending
money or anything of value to support or oppose any initiative, referendum,
recall, constitutional amendment, charter amendment, or any other question
formally certified or submitted to the electors of the State or any of its political
subdivisions. “Ballot-issue activity” does not include any bona fide news
VT LEG #385330 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.793
2026 Page 14 of 25
story, commentary, or editorial distributed through an independent news
organization not owned or controlled by a political party, political committee,
or candidate.
(3) “Election activity” means paying, contributing, or expending money
or anything of value to support or oppose a candidate, political party, or
political committee. “Election activity” does not include any bona fide news
story, commentary, or editorial distributed through an independent news
organization not owned or controlled by a political party, political committee,
or candidate.
Sec. 7. 11 V.S.A. § 3208 is added to read:
§ 3208. POLITICAL ACTIVITY; LIMITATIONS
(a) A limited partnership organized under this chapter shall possess no
authority to engage in election activity or ballot-issue activity.
(b) Any election activity or ballot-issue activity undertaken, financed, or
directed by a limited partnership is ultra vires and void.
(c) A limited partnership that undertakes an ultra vires election activity or
ballot-issue activity shall be required to remit payment to the Office of the
State Treasurer of an amount equal to the value expended in the activity.
(d) The liability provisions set forth in subsection (b) of this section apply
to limited partnerships and to all general partners, limited partners, and other
VT LEG #385330 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.793
2026 Page 15 of 25
persons of the limited partnership who authorize, direct, control, or knowingly
participate in such activity.
(e) This section applies only to limited partnerships and does not apply to
general partnerships or other associations in which all partners bear unlimited
personal liability for the obligations of the partnership.
(f) As used in this section:
(1) “Artificial-person powers” means the powers necessary or
convenient to limited partnership purposes, excluding any authority to engage
in election activity or ballot-issue activity.
(2) “Ballot-issue activity” means paying, contributing, or expending
money or anything of value to support or oppose any initiative, referendum,
recall, constitutional amendment, charter amendment, or any other question
formally certified or submitted to the electors of the State or any of its political
subdivisions. “Ballot-issue activity” does not include any bona fide news
story, commentary, or editorial distributed through an independent news
organization not owned or controlled by a political party, political committee,
or candidate.
(3) “Election activity” means paying, contributing, or expending money
or anything of value to support or oppose a candidate, political party, or
political committee. “Election activity” does not include any bona fide news
story, commentary, or editorial distributed through an independent news
VT LEG #385330 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.793
2026 Page 16 of 25
organization not owned or controlled by a political party, political committee,
or candidate.
Sec. 8. 11 V.S.A. § 3408 is added to read:
§ 3408. POLITICAL ACTIVITY; LIMITATIONS
(a) A limited liability partnership organized under this chapter shall possess
no authority to engage in election activity or ballot-issue activity.
(b) Any election activity or ballot-issue activity undertaken, financed, or
directed by a limited liability partnership is ultra vires and void.
(c) A limited liability partnership that undertakes an ultra vires election
activity or ballot-issue activity shall be required to remit payment to the Office
of the State Treasurer of an amount equal to the value expended in the activity.
(d) The liability provisions set forth in subsection (b) of this section apply
to limited liability partnerships and to all partners and other persons who
authorize, direct, control, or knowingly participate in such activity.
(e) This section applies only to limited liability partnerships and does not
apply to general partnerships or other associations in which all partners bear
unlimited personal liability for the obligations of the partnership.
(f) As used in this section:
(1) “Artificial-person powers” means the powers necessary or
convenient to limited liability partnership purposes, excluding any authority to
engage in election activity or ballot-issue activity.
VT LEG #385330 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.793
2026 Page 17 of 25
(2) “Ballot-issue activity” means paying, contributing, or expending
money or anything of value to support or oppose any initiative, referendum,
recall, constitutional amendment, charter amendment, or any other question
formally certified or submitted to the electors of the State or any of its political
subdivisions. “Ballot-issue activity” does not include any bona fide news
story, commentary, or editorial distributed through an independent news
organization not owned or controlled by a political party, political committee,
or candidate.
(3) “Election activity” means paying, contributing, or expending money
or anything of value to support or oppose a candidate, political party, or
political committee. “Election activity” does not include any bona fide news
story, commentary, or editorial distributed through an independent news
organization not owned or controlled by a political party, political committee,
or candidate.
Sec. 9. 11A V.S.A. § 3.02 is amended to read:
§ 3.02. GENERAL POWERS
(a) All powers, privileges, and capacities granted or implied under the laws
of this State to a corporation organized under this title on or before December
31, 2026, are hereby revoked in their entirety.
(b) Unless its articles of incorporation provide otherwise, every Every
corporation has perpetual duration and succession in its corporate name and
VT LEG #385330 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.793
2026 Page 18 of 25
has the same powers as an individual to do all things necessary and convenient
to carry out its business and affairs organized under this title is granted
artificial-person powers along with any enumerated power that is consistent
with such artificial-person powers, including without limitation the power:
* * *
(c)(1) The creation and continued existence of a corporation organized
under this title is a conditional grant of legal status by the State and remains
subject to revocation or alteration at any time.
(2) Any act of a corporation organized under this title constituting
election activity or ballot-issue activity is ultra vires and void and results in
forfeiture of all charter privileges. The Secretary of State shall only reinstate
the corporation’s charter upon the corporation’s payment to the Office of the
State Treasurer of the amount equal to the unlawful expenditures along with a
certification of compliance.
(3) A foreign corporation that directly or indirectly undertakes, finances,
or directs election activity or ballot-issue activity in this State, or with respect
to any election or ballot measure submitted to the electors of this State, is
conclusively deemed to be transacting business in this State for jurisdiction and
enforcement purposes
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to invalidate, impair, or
modify any contract, debt instrument, security, or other legal obligation
VT LEG #385330 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.793
2026 Page 19 of 25
lawfully entered into by a corporation organized pursuant to this title on or
before December 31, 2026.
(d) As used in this section:
(1) “Artificial-person powers” means the powers necessary or
convenient to carry out the lawful purposes of a corporation, excluding any
authority of the corporation to engage in election activity or ballot-issue
activity.
(2) “Ballot-issue activity” means paying, contributing, or expending
money or anything of value to support or oppose any initiative, referendum,
recall, constitutional amendment, charter amendment, or any other question
formally certified or submitted to the electors of the State or any of its political
subdivisions. “Ballot-issue activity” does not include any bona fide news
story, commentary, or editorial distributed through an independent news
organization not owned or controlled by a political party, political committee,
or candidate.
(3) “Election activity” means paying, contributing, or expending money
or anything of value to support or oppose a candidate, political party, or
political committee. “Election activity” does not include any bona fide news
story, commentary, or editorial distributed through an independent news
organization not owned or controlled by a political party, political committee,
or candidate.
VT LEG #385330 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.793
2026 Page 20 of 25
Sec. 10. 11B V.S.A. chapter 3 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 3. PURPOSES AND POWERS
§ 3.01. PURPOSES
(a) A corporation may be organized under this chapter for any lawful
purpose or purposes consistent with the artificial-person powers granted
pursuant to section 3.02 of this chapter, including, without being limited to,
any one or more of the following purposes: charitable; benevolent;
eleemosynary; educational; civic; patriotic; political; religious; social;
fraternal; sororal; literary; cultural; athletic; scientific; agricultural;
horticultural; animal husbandry; and professional, commercial, industrial, or
trade association. Under no circumstances shall election activity or ballot-
issue activity be deemed a lawful purpose of a corporation organized under this
chapter.
* * *
§ 3.02. GENERAL POWERS
(a) All powers, privileges, and capacities granted or implied under the laws
of this State to a corporation organized under this title on or before December
31, 2026, are hereby revoked in their entirety.
(b) Unless its articles of incorporation provide otherwise, every Every
corporation has perpetual duration and succession in its corporate name and
has the same powers as an individual to do all things necessary or convenient
VT LEG #385330 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.793
2026 Page 21 of 25
to carry out its affairs organized under this title is granted artificial-person
powers along with any enumerated power that is consistent with such artificial-
person powers, including, without limitation, the power:
* * *
(18) to do all things necessary or convenient, not inconsistent with law,
and within the scope of artificial-person powers, to further the activities and
affairs of the corporation.
(c)(1) A corporation organized under this title that operates primarily as a
political committee or political party may engage in election activity or ballot-
issue activity only to the extent permitted by law and shall claim no charter
privilege other than limited liability for its members, directors, and officers.
(2) The creation and continued existence of a corporation organized
under this title is a conditional grant of legal status by the State and remains
subject to revocation or alteration at any time.
(3) Any act of a corporation organized under this title constituting
election activity or ballot-issue activity is ultra vires and void and results in
forfeiture of all charter privileges. The Secretary of State shall only reinstate
the corporation’s charter upon the corporation’s payment to the Office of the
State Treasurer of the amount equal to the unlawful expenditures along with a
certification of compliance.
VT LEG #385330 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.793
2026 Page 22 of 25
(4) A foreign corporation that directly or indirectly undertakes, finances,
or directs election activity or ballot-issue activity in this State, or with respect
to any election or ballot measure submitted to the electors of this State, is
conclusively deemed to be transacting business in this State for jurisdiction and
enforcement purposes.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to invalidate, impair, or
modify any contract, debt instrument, security, or other legal obligation
lawfully entered into by a corporation organized pursuant to this title on or
before December 31, 2026.
(d) As used in this chapter:
(1) “Artificial-person powers” means the powers necessary or
convenient to carry out the lawful purposes of a corporation, excluding any
authority of the corporation to engage in election activity or ballot-issue
activity.
(2) “Ballot-issue activity” means paying, contributing, or expending
money or anything of value to support or oppose any initiative, referendum,
recall, constitutional amendment, charter amendment, or any other question
formally certified or submitted to the electors of the State or any of its political
subdivisions. “Ballot-issue activity” does not include any bona fide news
story, commentary, or editorial distributed through an independent news
VT LEG #385330 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.793
2026 Page 23 of 25
organization not owned or controlled by a political party, political committee,
or candidate.
(3) “Election activity” means paying, contributing, or expending money
or anything of value to support or oppose a candidate, political party, or
political committee.
* * *
Sec. 11. 11C V.S.A. § 106 is amended to read:
§ 106. POWERS
(a) All powers, privileges, and capacities granted or implied under the laws
of this State to a mutual benefit enterprise organized under this title on or
before December 31, 2026, are hereby revoked in their entirety.
(b) A mutual benefit enterprise may sue and be sued in its own name and
do all things necessary or convenient to carry on its activities is granted only
artificial-person powers. An enterprise may maintain an action against a
member for harm caused to the enterprise by the member’s violation of a duty
to the enterprise or of the organic laws or organic rules.
(c)(1) The creation and continued existence of an enterprise organized
under this title is a conditional grant of legal status by the State and remains
subject to revocation or alteration at any time.
(2) Any act of an enterprise organized under this title constituting
election activity or ballot-issue activity is ultra vires and void.
VT LEG #385330 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.793
2026 Page 24 of 25
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to invalidate, impair, or
modify any contract, debt instrument, security, or other legal obligation
lawfully entered into by an enterprise organized pursuant to this title on or
before December 31, 2026.
(d) As used in this section:
(1) “Artificial-person powers” means the powers necessary or
convenient to carry out the lawful purposes of an enterprise, excluding any
authority of the enterprise to engage in election activity or ballot-issue activity.
(2) “Ballot-issue activity” means paying, contributing, or expending
money or anything of value to support or oppose any initiative, referendum,
recall, constitutional amendment, charter amendment, or any other question
formally certified or submitted to the electors of the State or any of its political
subdivisions. “Ballot-issue activity” does not include any bona fide news
story, commentary, or editorial distributed through an independent news
organization not owned or controlled by a political party, political committee,
or candidate.
(3) “Election activity” means paying, contributing, or expending money
or anything of value to support or oppose a candidate, political party, or
political committee. “Election activity” does not include any bona fide news
story, commentary, or editorial distributed through an independent news
VT LEG #385330 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.793
2026 Page 25 of 25
organization not owned or controlled by a political party, political committee,
or candidate.
Sec. 12. APPLICABILITY OF CORPORATE POWER RESET
(a) Nothing in this act shall invalidate, impair, or modify any contract, debt
instrument, security, or other legal obligation lawfully entered into on or before
December 31, 2026.
(b) No power, privilege, or capacity withheld or limited by this act shall be
revived, reinstated, or implied by operation of law or judicial construction.
(c) If any provision of this act is held invalid as applied to any artificial
legal person, the invalidity shall not be construed to authorize that entity to
engage in election activity or ballot-issue activity or to revive any power,
privilege, or capacity withheld by this act.
Sec. 13. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
VT LEG #385330 v.6